Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. In General

Cross references. —

As to disqualification, resignation or suspension of executors and administrators, see §§

2-3-121

to

2-3-135

.

As to contest of wills after probate, see §§

2-6-301

to

2-6-306

.

As to claims against estate, see §

2-7-701

et seq.

As to proceedings to determine heirship to land, see §§

2-9-201

to

2-9-204

.

As to distributive share of nonresident or absentee, see §§

2-15-104

to

2-15-106

.

As to Uniform Estate Tax Apportionment Act, see §§

2-10-101

to

2-10-110

.

For constitutional provision that all courts shall be open to all persons, see art. 1, § 8, Wyo. Const.

For provision that trial by jury shall be inviolate, see art. 1, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to transfer of causes, records, etc., from probate courts to district courts upon adoption of original constitution, see art. 21, § 17, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation of actions generally, see §§

1-3-101

to

1-3-119

.

As to guardian and ward generally, see title 3.

As to courts generally, see §

5-1-101

et seq.

As to legal time and holidays, see §§

8-4-101

to

8-4-106

.

Law reviews. —

See note, “Probate Procedure — Distinctions Between the Probate and Civil Arms of the District Courts,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 241 (1965).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts §§ 32; 80 Am. Jur. 2d Wills §§ 723 to 730, 732 to 737, 739, 741 to 748, 750 to 754.

What constitutes “estate” of nonresident decedent within statute providing for local ancillary administration where decedent died leaving an estate in jurisdiction, 34 ALR2d 1270.

Summary judgment procedure in will probate or contest proceedings, 52 ALR2d 1207.

Function, power, and discretion of court where there is testamentary appointment of guardian of minor, 67 ALR2d 803.

Jurisdiction of probate court to grant relief from election to take under or against will, 71 ALR2d 942.

Necessity that executor or administrator be represented by counsel in presenting matters in probate court, 19 ALR3d 1104.

21 C.J.S. Courts § 76; 95 C.J.S. Wills §§ 446, 468, 469, 527, 528; 97 C.J.S. Wills §§ 1558 to 1560.

§ 2-2-101.
Exclusive jurisdiction conferred on district courts.

The district courts of the state have exclusive original jurisdiction of all matters relating to the probate and contest of wills and testaments, the granting of letters testamentary and of administration, and the settlement and distribution of decedents’ estates. The court granting the letters has exclusive jurisdiction of all matters touching the settlement and distribution of the estates for which letters have been granted. The jurisdiction over subject matter of the district court sitting in probate, sometimes referred to in this Title 2 as the “probate court”, is coextensive with the jurisdiction over subject matter of the district court in any civil action. A decree of distribution entered by the district court in probate, pursuant to W.S.

2-7-807

or

2-7-813

, shall be a final determination of title as to assets described therein, as to all distributees served with notice, or who have waived notice, of the hearing provided for in W.S.

2-7-807

or

2-7-811

, as the case may be. As to all other parties, an action may be brought and maintained at any time prior to the entry of final decree of distribution under W.S.

2-7-813

, by or against the personal representative in the district court, sitting in probate, seeking any legal or equitable remedy as to any interest in property, real or personal, in which the estate asserts or claims any interest. In addition, all causes cognizable in the district court in any civil action may be brought and maintained, at any time prior to the entry of final decree of distribution under W.S. 2-7-813, by or against a personal representative in the district court sitting in probate which granted the letters to the personal representative.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 1, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4531; C.S. 1910, § 5400; C.S. 1920, § 6673; R.S. 1931, § 88-201; C.S. 1945, § 6-101; W.S. 1957, § 2-3; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-101

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1985, ch. 17, § 1.

Cross references. —

For venue provisions relating to nonresidents, see §

2-2-102

. See also §

2-2-103

.

Final order. —

Although the probate court never entered an order discharging the personal representative, the court's “Order Approving Final Report and Accounting, and Decree of Distribution” was a final appealable order as a matter of law, and was therefore not interlocutory in nature. There was no appeal from the decree, and it was final unless it was void. Jubie v. Dahlke (In re Estate of Dahlke), 2014 WY 29, 319 P.3d 116,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2014).

Term “district court”

is used in a broad or inclusive sense as if there were one district court in a given judicial district for several counties, and as if there were one district court in a given county for the several jurisdictions such as civil, criminal and probate. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Amending the definition of the jurisdiction of the district court

sitting in probate so that it is “coextensive” with the subject matter jurisdiction of the district court in any civil action is not sufficient to vest exclusive jurisdiction in the probate court. Spear v. Nicholson, 882 P.2d 1237,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1994).

Jurisdiction in probate matters limited and special. —

While in this state the district court is the court of general jurisdiction, and the same court has, by art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const., jurisdiction of all matters of probate, yet, in the exercise of its probate powers, its jurisdiction is limited and special, and when its acts in probate are beyond the limits of the special jurisdiction conferred, they have no binding effect even upon those who have invoked its authority. In re Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 389, 343 P.2d 508,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(1959), rehearing denied, 80 Wyo. 426, 345 P.2d 786 (1959), quoting Church v. Quiner, 31 Wyo. 222, 224 P. 1073,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1924).

It extends to nonresidents. —

Where a nonresident dies within the state leaving personal property, the district court of the county where the person died leaving property therein has jurisdiction in administration of the estate. Bliler v. Boswell, 9 Wyo. 57, 59 P. 798,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 9 Wyo. 57, 59 P. 798,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1900).

District court of county wherein is situated property of decedent who dies out of state and is nonresident has jurisdiction over probate of will of such decedent and to grant letters testamentary, or of administration with will annexed, as the case may require. Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1905).

For venue provisions relating to nonresidents, see §

2-2-102

. See also §

2-2-103

.

Jurisdiction proper where trial court had granted letters of administration. —

Trial court had jurisdiction under this section to enter an order authorizing a personal representative to sell estate property because the decedent's interest in the subject property clearly touched upon the settlement of an estate for which the trial court had previously granted letters of administration. George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

Suit by hospital against personal representative of estate

to recover $2,133.87, following the rejection of its claim, was in the exclusive jurisdiction of the county court, as provided in §

5-5-131

(now §

5-9-128

), and not within the probate jurisdiction of the district court pursuant to this section. Ivinson Memorial Hosp. v. Swindler, 828 P.2d 1190,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1992).

Actions by executors in foreign states. —

Generally, an executor cannot bring an action in courts of another state other than that in which he has been authorized to act, in absence of statutory authority. Security-First Nat'l Bank v. King, 46 Wyo. 59, 23 P.2d 851,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1933).

Power over estate in guardianship. —

A court sitting in probate has power over the estate in a guardianship as it has over the estate of a decedent. Wayman v. Alanko, 351 P.2d 100,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1960).

Including determination of title to property in dispute. —

Due mainly to the necessities of the case, when the guardian claims property belonging to the guardianship, the trial court, sitting in probate, has jurisdiction to determine the title to the property in dispute. Wayman v. Alanko, 351 P.2d 100,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1960), quoting Security-First Nat'l Bank v. King, 46 Wyo. 59, 23 P.2d 851,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1933).

Power to order decedent's store kept open. —

District court has power and jurisdiction in all matters of probate and jurisdiction to order that retail store owned by decedent be kept open during period of administration and that his administratrix be allowed fee for extraordinary service in management thereof. In re Austin's Estate, 37 Wyo. 313, 261 P. 130,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1927).

Broad discretion in revocation of letters testamentary. —

The discretion of the appointing court in matters relating to revocation of letters testamentary is broad, and its exercise is subject to review only for abuse. In re Estate of Mayne, 345 P.2d 790,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1959).

Presumption of regularity

of proceedings of district court applies to proceedings in probate matters. Lethbridge v. Lauder, 13 Wyo. 9, 76 P. 682,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1904).

The presumption of regularity that applies upon collateral attack to district court judgments in other cases applies with equal force to probate proceedings. Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1905).

Whether paper propounded deemed “last will of the decedent” only issue in contested probate. —

Generally speaking, the remedy of a person injured by the violation of a contract for the execution of wills containing reciprocal bequests and bequests to third persons effective upon the death of the surviving testator is not to be had in a contest of the probate of the will which constitutes the violation of which complaint is made, since, in the absence of statute, the only issue on a contested probate is whether the paper propounded is “the last will of the decedent.” Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 389, 343 P.2d 508,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), modified, In re Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 426, 345 P.2d 786,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1959).

And only matters affecting validity and subsistence of will to be considered. —

This section does not change the fact that in a proceeding for the probate of an instrument as the last will and testament of the deceased only matters affecting the validity and subsistence of the will should be considered, and any right or claim against the estate arising through contract must be asserted in an independent action against the administrator or the executor of the estate, as the case may be. Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 389, 343 P.2d 508,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), modified, In re Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 426, 345 P.2d 786,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1959).

So one having contractual rights arising from previous will must rely on separate action. —

If anyone has contractual rights arising from previous wills, these claims and rights must be ascertained and adjudicated in a proper suit, separate and apart from the probate proceeding, which is, and must remain, exclusively one to determine the validity and subsistence of a last will and testament of the deceased, and any such action must, of course, be brought against the administrator or executor of deceased's estate, and any right or claim established must be satisfied during the administration of that estate. Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 389, 343 P.2d 508,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), modified, In re Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 426, 345 P.2d 786,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1959).

Claims relating to events preceding decedent's death,

tort claims and the exercise by the widow and her son of undue influence with respect to inter vivos transfers and trust amendments, were claims over which the district court had subject matter jurisdiction. Spear v. Nicholson, 882 P.2d 1237,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Brennan, 433 P.2d 512,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1967); In re Estate of Reed, 566 P.2d 587,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 270

(Wyo. 1977); Moncrief v. Williston Basin Interstate Pipeline Co., 880 F. Supp. 1495, 1995 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3381 (D. Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

First Wyo. Bank v. First Nat'l Bank & Trust Co., 628 P.2d 1355,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 346

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. Ranck, 767 P.2d 612,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1989); Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004); Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Exclusiveness of jurisdiction of probate court under doctrine of custodia legis, precluding replevin or similar possessory action, 42 A.L.R.2d 418.

§ 2-2-102.
Venue generally.

Wills shall be proved and letters testamentary or of administration granted:

In the county of which the decedent was a resident at the time of his death, regardless of where he may have died;

In the county in which the decedent died, leaving estate therein, if the decedent was not a resident of the state at the time of his death;

In the county in which any part of the estate may be, if the decedent died out of the state and was not resident thereof at the time of his death;

In the county in which any part of the estate may be, if the decedent was not a resident of the state and did not leave estate in the county in which he died;

In all other cases, in the county in which the decedent died, and application for letters is made.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 2, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4530; C.S. 1910, § 5407; C.S. 1920, § 6679; R.S. 1931, § 88-207; C.S. 1945, § 6-201; W.S. 1957, § 2-4; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-102

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to venue generally, see §§

1-5-101

to

1-5-108

.

As to change of venue or judge, see §§

1-7-101

,

1-7-102

and Rule 40.1, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Where nonresident dies outside state and leaves property in certain county within state,

district court of that county has jurisdiction to grant letters of administration. Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1905).

Codicil executed in another state. —

When determining the validity of a codicil executed in another state by a Wyoming resident, Wyoming courts will apply the law of Wyoming unless the execution did not conform to the requirements of this title; only then will Wyoming courts be justified in turning to the law of the place where the codicil was executed. In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

Admission to probate in state of domicile is not condition precedent

to admission in another state where decedent leaves real or personal property. In re Smith's Estate, 55 Wyo. 181, 97 P.2d 677,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1940).

Where a testator left real and personal property located in this state, the will may be probated in this state without waiting for the probate in the state where the testator resided and died. Rice v. Tilton, 13 Wyo. 420, 80 P. 828,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1905).

But local administration needed to acquire bank deposits. —

As to money on deposit in a local bank belonging to testatrix who was domiciled in another state, it seems local administration would be necessary to invest representative with complete authority to require its return or payment from the bank. In re Smith's Estate, 55 Wyo. 181, 97 P.2d 677,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1940).

Venue issue waived. —

Because the heirs did not raise the issue of improper venue in the trial court, but rather raised the issue of jurisdiction, they waived the right to address the issue of improper venue on appeal. George v. Allen (In re Estate of George), 2003 WY 129, 77 P.3d 1219,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Bliler v. Boswell, 9 Wyo. 57, 59 P. 798,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1900).

Law reviews. —

See note, “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See “The Presumption of Death Problem in Title Examination,” 6 Wyo. L.J. 189.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Probate, in state where assets are found, of will of nonresident which has not been admitted to probate in state of domicile, 20 ALR3d 1033.

§ 2-2-103.
Jurisdiction of estate of nonresident.

When the estate of the decedent is in more than one (1) county, the decedent having died out of the state and not being a resident thereof at the time of his death, or being a nonresident and dying within the state but not leaving estate in the county where he died, the district court of that county in which application is first made for letters testamentary or of administration has exclusive jurisdiction of the settlement of the estate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 2, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4538; C.S. 1910, § 5408; C.S. 1920, § 6680; R.S. 1931, § 88-208; C.S. 1945, § 6-202; W.S. 1957, § 2-5; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-103

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-2-104.
Court to remain open.

For the purpose of granting probate of wills, issuing letters testamentary and of administration, filing reports, accounts and petitions of personal representatives, filing claims against the estate and issuing process and notices required by the Probate Code, the court shall operate under the same term of court as specified in W.S. 5-3-101(b).

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 1, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4532; C.S. 1910, § 5401; C.S. 1920, § 6674; R.S. 1931, § 88-202; C.S. 1945, § 6-102; W.S. 1957, § 2-6; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-104

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "the court shall operate under the same term of court as specified in W.S. 5-3-101(b)" for "the court shall be kept open in the vacation period, and the business pertaining thereto done by the court commissioner and the clerk, shall be subject to the supervision of the court at the next ensuing term."

Meaning of “Probate Code.” —

The term “Probate Code” refers to the Wyoming Probate Code. See §

2-1-101

and notes thereto.

Cited

in

In re Austin's Estate, 37 Wyo. 313, 261 P. 130,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(1927).

§ 2-2-105.
Orders in vacation to be written, filed and recorded. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 1, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 4533; C.S. 1910, § 5402; C.S. 1920, § 6675; R.S. 1931, § 88-203; C.S. 1945, § 6-103; W.S. 1957, § 2-7; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-105

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 2-2-106.
Powers and duties of court commissioners; generally.

The court commissioner of each district court shall, upon a general order made for that purpose, examine the bonds filed by the personal representatives, with a view to ascertaining their sufficiency, and may approve the same. He may examine any inventory, sale bill, account current, except final accounts and vouchers filed therewith, or examine into the condition of an estate generally. Upon a specific order of the court, the commissioner may make orders for the sale of personal property at public or private auction, for the compounding of debts, for the settlement of an estate as insolvent, for the approval of bonds and all other orders of an ex parte nature as may facilitate the settlement of estates. The orders shall be in writing, signed by the judge or commissioner issuing the same, and shall be filed and recorded.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 1, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4534; C.S. 1910, § 5403; C.S. 1920, § 6676; R.S. 1931, § 88-204; C.S. 1945, § 6-104; W.S. 1957, § 2-8; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-106

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "district court shall, upon a general order" for "district court shall, upon the order of the court in vacation, or upon a general order" in the first sentence and added the third and fourth sentences.

Cross references. —

As to fees of court commissioner in probate matters, see §

2-2-404

.

As to bond of executors and administrators generally, see §§

2-3-102

to

2-3-120

.

As to appointment of administrator of an estate by judge or court or commissioner thereof in vacation, see §

2-4-202

.

As to granting of injunctions by district court or a judge thereof or, in the absence from the county of such judge, by the court commissioner of the county, see §§

1-28-101

to

1-28-111

.

As to court commissioners generally, see §§

5-3-301

to

5-3-312

.

§ 2-2-107.
Powers and duties of court commissioners; compelling attendance of witnesses; process.

In order to make such examination, the court commissioner is entitled to process to compel the personal representative and other witnesses to appear and testify before him on the hearing, and for the production of books, papers, monies or other things pertinent to the matter to be heard.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 1, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4535; C.S. 1910, § 5404; C.S. 1920, § 6677; R.S. 1931, § 88-205; C.S. 1945, § 6-105; W.S. 1957, § 2-9; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-107

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-2-108.
Powers and duties of court commissioners; compelling attendance of witnesses; failure to appear or testify.

Any person refusing to appear or testify before a commissioner may be cited for contempt and held to bail to answer to the alleged contempt as soon as reasonably possible. The commissioner shall report his findings upon the matter in writing, to the court for its action. Exception may be filed to the report which shall be heard and determined as in other cases.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 1, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 4536; C.S. 1910, § 5405; C.S. 1920, § 6678; R.S. 1931, § 88-206; C.S. 1945, § 6-106; W.S. 1957, § 2-10; W.S. 1977, §

2-2-108

; Laws 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “testify before a commissioner” for “testify in vacation,” and “alleged contempt as soon as reasonably possible” for “alleged contempt at the next term of court” in the first sentence.

Cited

in

Mau v. Stoner, 12 Wyo. 478, 76 P. 584,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1904).

§ 2-2-109.
Authority of other judges to act when district judge sick.

Whenever any judge of the district court is absent from the state, sick or otherwise unable to attend to the duties of his office, any other district judge shall have the same powers as the original judge, including the power to examine into all matters, make all orders and direct the affairs of the administration of estates.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 28, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 4564; C.S. 1910, § 5493; C.S. 1920, § 6766; R.S. 1931, § 88-1504; C.S. 1945, § 6-110; W.S. 1957, § 2-14; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-112; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "district judge shall have the same powers as the original judge, including the power to examine into all matters, make all orders and direct the affairs of the administration of estates" for "district judge may, upon application, examine into all matters, make all orders, and direct the affairs of the administration of estates that are required to be performed by judges in vacation, and shall have the same powers as the original judge would have."

Cross references. —

For provision that judges of district court shall hold court for each other, see §

5-3-106

.

As to assignment of retired judge to hold court, see §

5-3-107

.

§ 2-2-110.
When judge disqualified; exception.

When the judge before whom probate matters are brought is interested as next of kin to the decedent, or as the legatee or devisee under the will, or has any other interest in the outcome of, or concerning the matters brought before him, he shall call in some other district judge to hear and determine all such matters. Being a witness to a will does not itself disqualify a district judge, after the will has been probated, from hearing any matters concerning the will or the estate being probated except matters relating to the admission of the will to probate and contests thereon, and the granting of letters testamentary or of administration thereunder.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 10, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 4621; C.S. 1910, § 5481; C.S. 1920, § 6754; Laws 1921, ch. 8, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 88-1201; C.S. 1945, § 6-1208; W.S. 1957, § 2-15; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-113; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to change of venue or judge, see §§

1-7-101

,

1-7-102

and Rule 40.1, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Disqualification of judge under 28 USC § 455(b)(5)(iii), where judge or his or her spouse, or certain of their relatives, is known to have an interest that could be affected by the proceeding, 54 ALR Fed 855.

§ 2-2-111.
Presumption after ten years notices properly given.

In any estate, wherein a decree of final settlement and distribution is or has been entered by any court of this state it shall, after ten (10) years from the date of the decree, be conclusively presumed that all notices required by law have been made and for the times and in the manner required by law.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 107, § 1; 1945, ch. 78, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-2309; W.S. 1957, § 2-16; W.S. 1977, § 2-2-114; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to conveyances validated generally, see §§

34-5-101

to

34-5-117

.

Section makes conclusive presumption that all required notices are published.

Davidek v. Wyoming Inv. Co., 77 Wyo. 141, 308 P.2d 941,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1957).

It cannot be upheld as applied to notices deemed jurisdictional. —

This section is all-inclusive and creates a conclusive presumption that all notices required by law have been published for the times and in the manner required by law. That includes notices which are jurisdictional — that is to say, notices which are essential in order to constitute due process of law — and in that respect, the section considered as a curative act cannot be upheld. Addison v. Fleenor, 65 Wyo. 119, 196 P.2d 991,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1948).

But proceedings insofar as nonjurisdictional seemingly validated. —

In view of the fact that the legislature of Wyoming undertook to legislate in this section as to all notices in probate proceedings, there is no reason to think that it would not have validated proceedings insofar as they are nonjurisdictional. Addison v. Fleenor, 65 Wyo. 119, 196 P.2d 991,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1948).

Notice to creditors and notice to set aside homestead

would be jurisdictional, unless they were nonjurisdictional because the court already had jurisdiction of, or against, the parties and of the subject matter by reason of some notice in the probate proceeding previously given. Addison v. Fleenor, 65 Wyo. 119, 196 P.2d 991,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1948).

Since the provisions of §§

2-4-211

,

2-4-212

and

2-7-703

contemplate that claims of an estate shall be presented promptly and may be filed before notice to creditors is given, and since claims of creditors are barred by the general statute of limitations of not more than 10 years, the curative provisions of this section do not invade any constitutional rights in connection with such claims where there was a failure to give notice to creditors which was not jurisdictional. Addison v. Fleenor, 65 Wyo. 119, 196 P.2d 991,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1948).

Where a failure to give notice of the setting off of a homestead was not jurisdictional, that failure could be healed by the curative provisions of this section. Addison v. Fleenor, 65 Wyo. 119, 196 P.2d 991,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1948).

Law reviews. —

See note, “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.